Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 6. Supervision by State Banking Commissioner

§ 13-7-601.
Annual statement by associations. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 17-116; C.S. 1945, § 36-117; Laws 1953, ch. 167, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-230; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 13-7-602.
Duties generally; examinations.

The state banking commissioner shall supervise and administer the laws with respect to all state savings and loan associations doing business in this state. He shall make an examination into the affairs of all savings and loan associations consistent with the requirements of W.S. 13-3-702(a).

Repealed by Laws 2015 ch. 68, § 2.

If the association is found to be in an unsafe condition, its charter may be suspended until the matters complained of by the state banking commissioner have been remedied.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 17-117; C.S. 1945, § 36-118; W.S. 1957, § 13-231; Laws 1971, ch. 20, § 2; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for perjury, see §

6-5-301

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), rewrote the second through fourth sentences, pertaining to specific duties of the state banking commissioners in examining savings and loan associations; repealed former (b), pertaining to collection and use of examination fees and expenses; and in (c), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “The state banking commissioner shall report the condition of each association to the governor with recommendations.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 13-7-603.
Supervision fees.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 14, § 2.

The state banking commissioner shall collect from each savings and loan association chartered by this state for supervision an amount based upon the total assets of the association as reflected by the monthly report of financial data for the end of June and December of each year. The amount shall be adjusted by regulation issued by the state banking commissioner to assure consistency with the cost of supervision. Any adjustments shall be made by regulation issued by the state banking commissioner subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Each savings and loan association shall, not later than the last day of January and July, compute the semiannual supervisory fee based upon the report of condition next preceding upon forms provided by the state banking commissioner and shall submit the report together with payment to the state banking commissioner.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 156, § 3.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 17-121; C.S. 1945, § 36-124; W.S. 1957, § 13-231; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 156, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 13-7-604.
Examination at request of members or shareholders.

Any association is subject to examination by the state banking commissioner upon the application of three (3) or more of its members in addition to examinations pursuant to W.S.

13-7-602

. If it appears to the state banking commissioner that the association is violating any of the provisions of this act or is conducting its business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner, he shall direct the discontinuance of any illegal or unsafe practices. If the association fails to comply with the order, or fails to make reports as required, the state banking commissioner shall notify the attorney general who shall institute proceedings as the case requires.

Upon request in writing of any number of shareholders representing at least one thousand (1,000) shares of stock the state banking commissioner may examine the affairs of the association. If the association is insolvent the examiner shall assume temporary control of the association pursuant to law.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 100, § 1; 1897, ch. 78, § 10; R.S. 1899, §§ 31-49, 31-54; C.S. 1910, §§ 4089, 4094; C.S. 1920, §§ 5223, 5228; R.S. 1931, §§ 17-310, 17-315; C.S. 1945, §§ 36-312, 36-313; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-265, 13-266; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).